fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Maatalous > Karjatalous > Rehu: Karjan ruoka; Kananruoka; Vuohien ja lampaiden ruoka; Karjaeläinten ruoka; Sianruoka
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Agricultura > Criação de animais > Alimentação animal: Alimentação de gado; Alimentação de galinhas; Alimentação de cabras e ovelhas; Alimentação de manadas mistas; Alimentação de porcos
es: Economía e industria > Agricultura > Cría de animales > Alimentación de ganado: Alimento para ganado; Alimento para pollos; Alimento para cabras y ovejas; Alimento para ganado mixto; Alimento para cerdos
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 농업 > 축산업 > 가축 사료: 소 사료; 닭 사료; 염소 & 양 사료; 자가 배합 사료; 돼지 사료
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Poljoprivreda > Stočarstvo > Hrana za stoku: Hrana za govedo; Hrana za piliće; Hrana za koze i ovce; Hrana za mješovito stado; Hrana za svinje
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Agricultură > Creșterea animalelor > Hrană pentru animale: Furaj pentru bovine; Furaj pentru găini; Furaj pentru capre și oi; Furaj pentru turme mixte; Furaj pentru porci
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 農業 > 畜牧業 > 家畜飼料: 牛飼料; 雞飼料; 山羊和綿羊飼料; 家禽飼料; 豬飼料
en: Business & Industrial > Agriculture > Animal Husbandry > Livestock Feed: Cattle Feed; Chicken Feed; Goat & Sheep Feed; Mixed Herd Feed; Pig Feed
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Nông nghiệp > Chăn nuôi > Thức ăn gia súc: Thức ăn cho gia súc; Thức ăn cho gà; Thức ăn cho dê và cừu; Thức ăn gia súc hỗn hợp; Thức ăn cho heo
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Agriculture > Élevage > Nourriture pour bétail: Aliment pour bétail; Aliment pour volaille; Aliment pour chèvres et moutons; Aliment pour troupeaux mixtes; Aliment pour cochons
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Žemės ūkis > Gyvulininkystė > Gyvulių pašaras: Galvijų pašaras; Lesalas vištoms; Ožkų ir avių pašaras; Pašaras mišriai bandai; Kiaulių pašaras
it: Commercio e industria > Agricoltura > Zootecnia > Mangime per bestiame: Mangime per bovini; Mangime per polli; Mangime per capre e pecore; Mangime per mandrie miste; Mangime per maiali
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 農業 > 畜産 > 家畜用飼料: 牛の飼料; 鶏の飼料; ヤギ・羊の飼料; 家畜の飼料; 豚の飼料
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Agricultura > Pecuária > Ração para pecuária: Ração para gado; Ração para aves; Ração para caprinos e ovinos; Ração mista para rebanho; Ração para suínos
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Mezőgazdaság > Állattenyésztés > Haszonállat-takarmány: Szarvasmarha-takarmány; Csirketakarmány; Kecske- és juhtakarmány; Vegyes csordatakarmány; Sertéstakarmány
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > เกษตรกรรม > การเลี้ยงสัตว์ > อาหารสำหรับปศุสัตว์: อาหารวัว; อาหารไก่; อาหารแกะและแพะ; อาหารสำหรับสัตว์หลายชนิด; อาหารหมู
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zemědělství > Zootechnika > Krmiva pro hospodářská zvířata: Krmivo pro dobytek; Krmivo pro slepice; Krmivo pro kozy a ovce; Krmivo pro více druhů dobytka; Krmivo pro prasata
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Tarım > Hayvancılık > Besi Hayvanı Yemi: Besi Yemleri; Tavuk Yemleri; Keçi ve Koyun Yemleri; Karışık Sürü Yemleri; Domuz Yemleri
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Poľnohospodárstvo > Chov zvierat > Krmivo pre hospodárske zvieratá: Krmivo pre dobytok; Krmivo pre kurčatá; Krmivo pre kozy a ovce; Krmivo pre zmiešané stádo; Krmivo pre ošípané
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Селско стопанство > Животновъдство > Фураж за добитък: Храна за едър рогат добитък; Храна за пилета; Храна за кози и овце; Смесен стаден фураж; Храна за свине
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 农/畜牧/渔业专用设备 > 畜牧业 > 畜牧饲料: 牛饲料; 鸡饲料; 山羊/绵羊饲料; 混合畜群饲料; 猪饲料
nb: Forretninger og industri > Jordbruk > Husdyrhold > Husdyrfôr: Storfefôr; Kyllingfôr; Geit- og sauefôr; Blandet husdyrfôr; Grisefôr
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Rolnictwo > Hodowla zwierząt > Pasza dla zwierząt gospodarskich: Pasza dla bydła; Pasza dla kurcząt; Pasza dla kóz i owiec; Mieszanki paszowe dla stad; Pasza dla trzody chlewnej
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Agrarische sector > Veeteelt > Veevoer: Rundveevoer; Kippenvoer; Geiten- en schapenvoer; Veevoer voor gemengde kudde; Varkensvoer
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Kmetijstvo > Živinoreja > Krma za živino: Krma za govedo; Krma za piščance; Krma za koze in ovce; Krma za mešano čredo; Krma za prašiče
sv: Företag och industri > Jordbruk > Boskapsskötsel > Foder till boskap: Boskapsfoder; Hönsfoder; Get- och fårfoder; Foder för blandad boskap; Grisfoder
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Landwirtschaft > Viehhaltung > Viehfutter: Rinderfutter; Hühnerfutter; Ziegen- und Schaffutter; Futter für gemischte Herden; Schweinefutter
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Γεωργία > Κτηνοτροφία > Ζωοτροφές: Ζωοτροφές για βοοειδή; Ζωοτροφές για κοτόπουλα; Ζωοτροφές για αιγοπρόβατα; Ζωοτροφές για μεικτά κοπάδια; Ζωοτροφές για χοίρους
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Сельское хозяйство > Животноводство > Корм для скота: Корм для крупного рогатого скота; Корм для кур; Корм для коз и овец; Корм для смешанного стада; Корм для свиней
da: Erhverv og industri > Landbrug > Husdyrbrug > Foder til landbrugsdyr: Foder til køer; Foder til høns; Foder til geder og får; Foder til forskellige dyr; Foder til grise